test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjectives_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:
  
  # Standard Adjectives

  Standard adjectives ending in -a:
    # Singular
    manar+N+Sing+Nom: manar
  
  
  # Weirdo adjectives
  
  Adjectives ending in -e that have an -i stem:
    carnë+A: carne
    carnë+A+Nsing: carni
    carnë+A+Sing+Loc: carnisse
    carnë+A+Plur+Ins: [carnínen, carninen]
    # Superlative
    carnë+A+Superl: ancarne  # TODO: not done yet
  
  # TODO: add more adjective tests
